District of Columbia statutes.
2-1203.03

Transfer of functions; abolishment of the Office of Tourism and Promotions.

(a)

All authority responsibilities, and functions assigned to the Office of Tourism and Promotions by Reorganization Plan No. 2 of 1992, effective October 1, 1992, including oversight responsibility for the D.C. Committee to Promote Washington and the Office of Motion Picture and Television Development, established by Mayor’s Order 79-218, dated September 14, 1979, are hereby transferred the Economic Development Liaison Office.

(b)

The Office of Tourism and Promotions, established by Reorganization Plan No. 2 of 1992, effective January 6, 1993, is hereby abolished.

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-175, § 1834, 45 DCR 7193
1981 Ed., § 1-2207.3.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 4 of the Equal Opportunity for Local, Small, or Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Temporary Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Law 13-216, April 3, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 3458).
For temporary addition of §§ 1-2207.1 through 1-2207.3 1981 Ed., see note to § 2-1203.01.
For temporary (90-day) addition of Chapter 1-A 1981 Ed., see notes following § 2-1203.01.
Establishment—Task Force on Tourism, see Mayor’s Order 2001-148, October 3, 2001 ( 48 DCR 9524).
Application of Law 12-175: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 2-1203.01.